Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1521
Persons authorized to print and distribute ballots; violation; penalty.

Any person who prints or causes to be printed or distributed any ballot marked Official Ballot other than an election commissioner, county clerk, or city or village clerk shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 420.